Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7702
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Model Act Regarding Use of Credit Information in Personal Insurance is to regulate the use of credit information for personal insurance, so that consumers are afforded certain protections with respect to the use of such information.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 2.